New York, session 2025-2026, S10001.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 7 of section 64 of the alcoholic beverage 2 control law is amended by adding a new paragraph (e-18) to read as 3 follows: 4 (e-18) Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subdi- 5 vision, the authority may issue a retail license for on-premises 6 consumption for a premises which shall be located within two hundred 7 feet of a building occupied as a school, church, synagogue or other 8 place of worship, provided such premises constitute a premises for the 9 sale of food or beverages at retail for consumption on the premises 10 located wholly within the boundaries of the county of Orange in the 11 village of Florida, at 22 N Main Street, bounded and described as 12 follows: 13 ALL that lot of land with the building and improvements thereon situ- 14 ate in the Town of Warwick, Village of Florida, County of Orange and 15 State of New York, bounded and described as follows: 16 BEGINNING on the West line of Main Street in Florida at the Northeast 17 corner of L. B. Vail's Hotel; thence along said street North six degrees 18 East, forty-one feet; thence North eighty-five degrees West, ninety 19 feet; thence South six degrees West, forty feet; thence South eighty- 20 four degrees forty-five minutes East, ninety feet; to the place of 21 beginning. 22 TOGETHER with a right of way to pass and re-pass to the rear end of 23 the said lot on the land lying between the store house of W. L. Vail and 24 the land conveyed hereby; such right of way being about eleven and one 25 half feet in width. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14180-02-6 S. 10001 2 1 ALSO all that tract or parcel of land situate in the Town of Warwick, 2 Village of Florida, County of Orange and State of New York, bounded and 3 described as follows: 4 BEGINNING at an iron in the northwesterly corner of the lands of David 5 Werner, said iron being S 37 degrees 50 minutes W, 90 feet from an iron 6 in the westerly line of Main Street in the Village of Florida, and 7 running from thence along the lands of Stanley Mioduszewski S 72 degrees 8 no minutes W 49.87 feet to an iron; thence along the same S 83 degrees 9 and 53 minutes W, 29.4 feet to the line of lands of Vail and Parkhurst; 10 thence along the latter S 5 degrees 40 minutes E, 23.37 feet to a corner 11 of lands formerly of W. J. Roe; thence along the latter N 88 degrees 37 12 minutes E 76.0 feet to a corner of the lands of David Werner; thence 13 along the latter N 2 degrees 20 minutes W, 40.0 feet to the place of 14 beginning. 15 TOGETHER with the use with others of a right of way extending from the 16 abovedescribed parcel along the northerly line of lands of David Werner 17 to the westerly line of Main Street. 18 TOGETHER with rights of way as described in Liber 734 cp. 436. 19 SUBJECT to conditions, notes, and setbacks as shown on filed map, if 20 any; easements, covenants, and restrictions of record; public utility 21 easements; and rights of the public in and to any portion of the proper- 22 ty lying in the bed of a public road. 23 BEING the same lands and premises described in a deed from Renee 24 Weiss, as Administratrix of the Estate of Morris Werner, to Werner Real- 25 ty of Florida, Ltd., and recorded in the Orange County Clerk's Office in 26 Liber 4177 of Deeds, at page 133. 27 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.